District of Columbia statutes.
42-523

Provisions applicable to personal property.

All the provisions of this chapter and of §§ 42-302 to 42-304 [repealed], 42-703, and 42-704 shall apply to personal property generally except where from the nature of the property they are inapplicable.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1036
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 538, ch. 1329
1981 Ed., § 45-223.
1973 Ed., § 45-823.